Illinois, session 104th, SB2404.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Confidentiality Act is amended by changing 6Section 12 as follows: 7    (740 ILCS 110/12)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 812)8    Sec. 12. (a) If the United States Secret Service or the 9Illinois State Police requests information from a mental 10health or developmental disability facility, as defined in 11Section 1-107 and 1-114 of the Mental Health and Developmental 12Disabilities Code, relating to a specific recipient and the 13facility director determines that disclosure of such 14information may be necessary to protect the life of, or to 15prevent the infliction of great bodily harm to, a public 16official, or a person under the protection of the United 17States Secret Service, only the following information may be 18disclosed: the recipient's name, address, and age and the date 19of any admission to or discharge from a facility; and any 20information which would indicate whether or not the recipient 21has a history of violence or presents a danger of violence to 22the person under protection. Any information so disclosed 23shall be used for investigative purposes only and shall not be   SB2404- 2 -LRB104 10270 JRC 20344 b1publicly disseminated. Any person participating in good faith 2in the disclosure of such information in accordance with this 3provision shall have immunity from any liability, civil, 4criminal or otherwise, if such information is disclosed 5relying upon the representation of an officer of the United 6States Secret Service or the Illinois State Police that a 7person is under the protection of the United States Secret 8Service or is a public official.9    For the purpose of this subsection (a), the term "public 10official" means the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney 11General, Secretary of State, State Comptroller, State 12Treasurer, member of the General Assembly, member of the 13United States Congress, Judge of the United States as defined 14in 28 U.S.C. 451, Justice of the United States as defined in 28 15U.S.C. 451, United States Magistrate Judge as defined in 28 16U.S.C. 639, Bankruptcy Judge appointed under 28 U.S.C. 152, or 17Supreme, Appellate, Circuit, or Associate Judge of the State 18of Illinois. The term shall also include the spouse, child or 19children of a public official.20    (b) The Department of Human Services (acting as successor 21to the Department of Mental Health and Developmental 22Disabilities) and all public or private hospitals and mental 23health facilities are required, as hereafter described in this 24subsection, to furnish the Illinois State Police only such 25information as may be required for the sole purpose of 26determining whether an individual who may be or may have been a   SB2404- 3 -LRB104 10270 JRC 20344 b1patient is disqualified because of that status from receiving 2or retaining a Firearm Owner's Identification Card or falls 3within the federal prohibitors under subsection (e), (f), (g), 4(r), (s), or (t) of Section 8 of the Firearm Owners 5Identification Card Act, or falls within the federal 6prohibitors in 18 U.S.C. 922(g) and (n). All physicians, 7clinical psychologists, or qualified examiners at public or 8private mental health facilities or parts thereof as defined 9in this subsection shall, in the form and manner required by 10the Department, provide notice directly to the Department of 11Human Services, or to his or her employer who shall then report 12to the Department, within 24 hours after determining that a 13person poses a clear and present danger to himself, herself, 14or others, or within 7 days after a person 14 years or older is 15determined to be a person with a developmental disability by a 16physician, clinical psychologist, or qualified examiner as 17described in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification 18Card Act. Any physician, clinical psychologist, or qualified 19examiner evaluating a patient under this Section must be 20trained and certified in mental illness and treating suicidal 21tendencies. The Department of Human Services must adopt rules 22providing the minimum number of evaluations a patient must 23receive under this Section. If a person is a patient as 24described in clause (1) of the definition of "patient" in 25Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, 26this information shall be furnished within 7 days after   SB2404- 4 -LRB104 10270 JRC 20344 b1admission to a public or private hospital or mental health 2facility or the provision of services. Any such information 3disclosed under this subsection shall remain privileged and 4confidential, and shall not be redisclosed, except as required 5by subsection (e) of Section 3.1 of the Firearm Owners 6Identification Card Act, nor utilized for any other purpose. 7The method of requiring the providing of such information 8shall guarantee that no information is released beyond what is 9necessary for this purpose. In addition, the information 10disclosed shall be provided by the Department within the time 11period established by Section 24-3 of the Criminal Code of 122012 regarding the delivery of firearms. The method used shall 13be sufficient to provide the necessary information within the 14prescribed time period, which may include periodically 15providing lists to the Department of Human Services or any 16public or private hospital or mental health facility of 17Firearm Owner's Identification Card applicants on which the 18Department or hospital shall indicate the identities of those 19individuals who are to its knowledge disqualified from having 20a Firearm Owner's Identification Card for reasons described 21herein. The Department may provide for a centralized source of 22information for the State on this subject under its 23jurisdiction. The identity of the person reporting under this 24subsection shall not be disclosed to the subject of the 25report. For the purposes of this subsection, the physician, 26clinical psychologist, or qualified examiner making the   SB2404- 5 -LRB104 10270 JRC 20344 b1determination and his or her employer shall not be held 2criminally, civilly, or professionally liable for making or 3not making the notification required under this subsection, 4except for willful or wanton misconduct. 5    Any person, institution, or agency, under this Act, 6participating in good faith in the reporting or disclosure of 7records and communications otherwise in accordance with this 8provision or with rules, regulations or guidelines issued by 9the Department shall have immunity from any liability, civil, 10criminal or otherwise, that might result by reason of the 11action. For the purpose of any proceeding, civil or criminal, 12arising out of a report or disclosure in accordance with this 13provision, the good faith of any person, institution, or 14agency so reporting or disclosing shall be presumed. The full 15extent of the immunity provided in this subsection (b) shall 16apply to any person, institution or agency that fails to make a 17report or disclosure in the good faith belief that the report 18or disclosure would violate federal regulations governing the 19confidentiality of alcohol and drug abuse patient records 20implementing 42 U.S.C. 290dd-3 and 290ee-3.21    For purposes of this subsection (b) only, the following 22terms shall have the meaning prescribed:23        (1) (Blank).24        (1.3) "Clear and present danger" has the meaning as 25    defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 26    Identification Card Act.   SB2404- 6 -LRB104 10270 JRC 20344 b1        (1.5) "Person with a developmental disability" has the 2    meaning as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 3    Identification Card Act.4        (2) "Patient" has the meaning as defined in Section 5    1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act.6        (3) "Mental health facility" has the meaning as 7    defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 8    Identification Card Act. 9    (c) Upon the request of a peace officer who takes a person 10into custody and transports such person to a mental health or 11developmental disability facility pursuant to Section 3-606 or 124-404 of the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code 13or who transports a person from such facility, a facility 14director shall furnish said peace officer the name, address, 15age and name of the nearest relative of the person transported 16to or from the mental health or developmental disability 17facility. In no case shall the facility director disclose to 18the peace officer any information relating to the diagnosis, 19treatment or evaluation of the person's mental or physical 20health.21    For the purposes of this subsection (c), the terms "mental 22health or developmental disability facility", "peace officer" 23and "facility director" shall have the meanings ascribed to 24them in the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code.25    (d) Upon the request of a peace officer or prosecuting 26authority who is conducting a bona fide investigation of a   SB2404- 7 -LRB104 10270 JRC 20344 b1criminal offense, or attempting to apprehend a fugitive from 2justice, a facility director may disclose whether a person is 3present at the facility. Upon request of a peace officer or 4prosecuting authority who has a valid forcible felony warrant 5issued, a facility director shall disclose: (1) whether the 6person who is the subject of the warrant is present at the 7facility and (2) the date of that person's discharge or future 8discharge from the facility. The requesting peace officer or 9prosecuting authority must furnish a case number and the 10purpose of the investigation or an outstanding arrest warrant 11at the time of the request. Any person, institution, or agency 12participating in good faith in disclosing such information in 13accordance with this subsection (d) is immune from any 14liability, civil, criminal or otherwise, that might result by 15reason of the action.16(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)